Utah statutes.
61-2c-208 (Superseded 01/01/10).   Activation and inactivation of license.
(1) (a)  A licensee may request that the division place the license on
inactive status by submitting an inactivation form approved by the division.
(b)  The license of a mortgage officer or mortgage entity not affiliated with
an active license of a principal lending manager automatically converts to
inactive status on the day on which the mortgage officer or mortgage entity is
not affiliated with the active license of the principal lending manager.
(c)  A licensee whose license is in inactive status may not transact the
business of residential mortgage loans.
(2)  To activate a license that has been placed on inactive status, a licensee
shall:
(a)  submit an activation form:
(i)  approved by the division; and
(ii)  signed by the principal lending manager with whom the licensee is
affiliating;
(b)  pay an activation fee established by the division under Section
63J-1-504; and
(c)  if the licensee is an individual whose license was in inactive status at
the time of the previous renewal, the licensee shall supply the division with
proof of the successful completion of the number of hours of continuing
education that the licensee would have been required to complete under
Subsection 61-2c-205(2)(c) if the licensee's license had been on active
status, up to a maximum of the number of hours required for two licensing
periods.
